Utah statutes.
53A-8a-601.   State Board of Education to make rules on performance compensation.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall make rules requiring a school district's employee compensation system to be aligned with the district's annual evaluation system.

(2)  Rules adopted under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  establish a timeline for developing and implementing an employee compensation system that is aligned with an annual evaluation system; and

(b)  provide that beginning no later than the 2015-16 school year:

(i)  any advancement on an adopted wage or salary schedule shall be based primarily on an evaluation; and

(ii)  an employee may not advance on an adopted wage or salary schedule if the employee's rating on the most recent evaluation is at the lowest level of an evaluation instrument.



Enacted by Chapter 425, 2012 General Session

